Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 59.
TAXATION (CONST., ART. 16, § 5, REPEALED; §§ 5, 14, 15, 16 ADDED).

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1242, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The Constitutional Issues Subcommittee of the House Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and a subcommittee of the Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall jointly conduct a study of property taxes relative to the impact of Amendments 59, 74, and 79 to the Arkansas Constitution.

“(b)

The subcommittees shall complete the study and make their findings and recommendations to the House Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs by October 31, 2006.”

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment repealed Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 5, and substituted a new section therefor which appears as Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 5, in the text of the Constitution. The amendment also added Ark. Const., Art. 16, §§ 14-16, which appear in the text of the Constitution. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly in 1979 (Extended Sess., 1980). It was voted on at the Nov. 4, 1980, election and adopted by a vote of 649,307 for and 152,629 against. See Wells v. Riviere, 269 Ark. 156, 599 S.W.2d 375 (1980), as to validity of proposal at extended session.